Arkansas, session 2025, HB1277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-7-907(a), concerning payments for
corrective action regarding petroleum storage tanks, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1)(A) No A payment for corrective action shall not be paid from
the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund until the owner or operator has
expended seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) the deductible set by
the rule of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission on
corrective action for the occurrence, except in cases in which the Director
of the Division of Environmental Quality is using emergency authority under §
8-7-905(e).
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly that this
initial level of expenditure be considered the equivalent of an insurance
policy deductible.
(2) Owners or operators of underground storage tanks must
demonstrate financial responsibility for the seven-thousand-five-hundred-
dollar deductible for corrective actions.

*JMB214*
03-18-2025 10:42:50 JMB214

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1277
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-7-907(d), concerning payments for
corrective action regarding petroleum storage tanks, is amended to read as
follows:
(d)(1)(A) Payment for corrective action may be denied if the storage
tank owner or operator fails to report a release as required by rule
promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, and the
failure to report the release causes a delay in the corrective action that
contributes to an adverse impact to the environment. The amount of the
deductible incurred by the owner or operator before the owner or operator is
eligible to receive payment for corrective action shall be established by
rule by the division with the advice and input of the Advisory Committee on
Petroleum Storage Tanks.
(B) However, the amount of the deductible shall not be
greater than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).
(2)(A) The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission,
with the advice and input of the Advisory Committee on Petroleum Storage
Tanks, shall provide through rule a deductible that is more than seven
thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) but does not exceed thirty thousand
dollars ($30,000) for violations of rules of the division as identified at
the time of the request for payment for corrective action.
(B) The rule may differentiate the variation of the
deductible based on the provision or section of the commission rule that was
violated.

/s/Gramlich











03-18-2025 10:42:50 JMB214